Tennessee, session 114, HB1933.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. The Tennessee advisory commission on intergovernmental relations
(TACIR) shall study and prepare a report on pay equity for assistant district attorneys general in
this state. All appropriate state departments and agencies shall provide assistance to TACIR in
connection with the study. On or before January 31, 2027, TACIR shall report its findings and
recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the chair of the committee of the house
of representatives having jurisdiction over judiciary matters, the chair of the judiciary committee
of the senate, and the legislative librarian. It is the legislative intent that this study must be
conducted from TACIR's existing resources.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1933
011719
- 1 -